Illinois, session 104th, HB2516.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The PFAS Reduction Act is amended by changing 5Section 5 and by adding Section 45 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 170/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 9Agency.10    "Class B firefighting foam" means foam designed to 11extinguish flammable liquid fires or prevent the ignition of 12flammable liquids.13    "Cosmetics" means products that are:14        (1) intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or 15    sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the 16    human body or any part of the human body for the purpose of 17    cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or 18    altering the appearance; or19        (2) intended for use as a component of any product 20    described in paragraph (1).21    "Cosmetics" includes soap. 22    "Dental floss" means a cord or cords of thin filaments 23used in interdental cleaning to remove debris and dental   HB2516 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1plaque from between teeth.2    "Fire department" means the duly authorized fire 3protection organization of a unit of local government, a 4Regional Fire Protection Agency, a fire protection district, 5or a volunteer fire department.6    "Intentionally added PFAS" means PFAS that are 7deliberately added during the manufacture of a product if the 8continued presence of the PFAS is desired in the final product 9or desired in one of the product's components to perform a 10specific function in the final product. "Intentionally added 11PFAS" does not include PFAS that are present in the product due 12to use of water containing PFAS if the manufacturer took no 13action that resulted in the PFAS being present in the water. 14    "Intimate apparel" means garments intended to be worn 15under clothes, usually with direct contact with skin. 16"Intimate apparel" includes bras, boxers, briefs, shapewear, 17sleepwear, thermals, loungewear, socks, and stockings.18    "Juvenile product" means a product designed or marketed 19for use by infants and children under 12 years of age. 20"Juvenile product" includes a baby or toddler foam pillow, 21bassinet, bedside sleeper, booster seat, changing pad, child 22restraint system for use in a motor vehicle and aircraft, 23co-sleeper, crib mattress, highchair, highchair pad, infant 24bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, infant sleep positioner, 25infant swing, infant travel bed, infant walker, nap cot, 26nursing pad, nursing pillow, play mat, playpen, play yard,   HB2516 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow, portable foam nap mat, 2portable infant sleeper, portable hook-on chair, soft-sided 3portable crib, stroller, and toddler mattress. "Juvenile 4product" does not include: (1) a children's electronic 5product, including a personal computer, audio and video 6equipment, calculator, wireless phone, game console, handheld 7device incorporating a video screen, or any associated 8peripheral component, such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply 9unit, or power cord; (2) an adult mattress; or (3) an internal 10component of a product that does not come into direct contact 11with a child's skin or mouth during reasonably foreseeable use 12or abuse of the product. 13    "Local government" means a unit of local government or 14other special purpose district that provides firefighting 15services.16    "Manufacturer" means a person that manufactures Class B 17firefighting foam and any agents of that person, including an 18importer, distributor, authorized servicer, factory branch, or 19distributor branch.20    "Menstrual product" means a product used to collect 21menstruation and vaginal discharge, including tampons, pads, 22sponges, menstruation underwear, disks, and menstrual cups, 23whether disposable or reusable.24    "Perfluoroalkyl substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 25"PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals 26containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.  HB2516 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1    "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, 2public or private corporation, limited liability company, or 3any other type of legal or commercial entity, including, but 4not limited to, members, managers, partners, directors, or 5officers.6    "Product" means an item that is manufactured, assembled, 7packaged, or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, 8including, but not limited to, its product components, and 9that is sold or distributed for personal, residential, 10commercial, or industrial use. "Product" does not include:11        (1) a prosthetic or orthotic device or any item that 12    is a medical device or drug or that is otherwise used in a 13    medical setting or in medical applications regulated by 14    the United States Food and Drug Administration;15        (2) packaging for the items described in paragraph 16    (1); and17        (3) products regulated by the Federal Insecticide, 18    Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act. 19    "Testing" means calibration testing, conformance testing, 20and fixed system testing.21(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.) 22    (415 ILCS 170/45 new)23    Sec. 45. Other banned products; other civil penalties; 24enforcement.25    (a) Beginning January 1, 2032, a person may not sell,   HB2516 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this State the 2following products if the product contains intentionally added 3PFAS:4        (1) cosmetics;5        (2) dental floss;6        (3) juvenile products; 7        (4) menstrual products; or8        (5) intimate apparel.9    (b) Subsection (a) of this Section does not apply to:10        (1) a product for which federal law governs the 11    presence in the product of a perfluoroalkyl substance or 12    polyfluoroalkyl substance in a manner that preempts State 13    authority;14        (2) used products offered for sale or resale;15        (3) an electronic or internal component of a product; 16    or17        (4) refrigerants, foams, and aerosol propellants that 18    are listed as acceptable, acceptable subject to use 19    conditions, or acceptable subject to narrowed use limits 20    by the United States Environmental Protection Agency 21    pursuant to the Significant New Alternatives Policy 22    Program, 40 CFR 82, Subpart G, as long as the refrigerant, 23    foam, or aerosol propellant is sold, offered for sale, or 24    distributed for sale for the use for which it is listed 25    pursuant to that program, except to the extent the items 26    described in this paragraph (4) are used in personal care   HB2516 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1    products.2    (c) By August 1, 2027, the Agency shall submit a report to 3the General Assembly that includes an assessment of statutory 4and regulatory authority, administrative infrastructure, 5research capabilities, and funding necessary to develop and 6implement a program for the review of fluoropolymers used in 7consumer products and their potential threat to human health 8and the environment. The report shall include an assessment of 9available scientific data regarding fluoropolymers, as well as 10an assessment of other State or federal statutory or 11regulatory actions taken regarding fluoropolymers. The report 12shall also include an assessment of potential critical uses of 13fluoropolymers and their relation to the supply chain. In this 14subsection, "fluoropolymers" means fluoropolymers consisting 15of polymeric substances for which the backbone of the polymer 16is either a perfluorinated or polyfluorinated carbon-only 17backbone or a perfluorinated polyether.18    (d) A person, other than a manufacturer subject to Section 1935 of this Act, who knowingly violates this Section is subject 20to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for the first violation 21and a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each subsequent 22violation. Civil penalties collected under this Section must 23be deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund to 24be used in accordance with the provisions of the Environmental 25Protection Trust Fund Act.26    (e) This Act and the civil penalties in this Act may be   HB2516 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03583 BDA 13607 b1enforced by the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of 2the county where the violation occurs by bringing an action in 3the name of the People of the State of Illinois in a court of 4competent jurisdiction alleging a violation of this Act. 5Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the Attorney 6General or the State's Attorney of the county where the 7violation occurs from seeking equitable remedies or other 8remedies in common law, in State or federal statute, or in 9State or federal rules or regulations to enforce this Act or to 10remedy harm from any action or omission in violation of this 11Act or in violation of common law, State or federal statute, or 12State or federal rules or regulations. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.